Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-139
Plans of state agencies; approval by Governor's Policy Research Office.

No state agency functional plan of the type referred to in section 84-137 may be promulgated, nor may any planning program of a state agency, department, or institution be undertaken, unless the Governor's Policy Research Office finds that such plans or planning programs are not in conflict with the laws of the State of Nebraska and executive orders of the Governor.

Laws 1969, c. 775, § 9, p. 2944;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 18.